Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1358YC (3) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 322.3, subsection 15, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A manufacturer of battery electric motor 3 vehicles, as defined in section 321.116, from being licensed 4 as a motor vehicle dealer of only the battery electric motor 5 vehicles manufactured by that manufacturer. 6